Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Part 2 Regulation and Care of Inmates
41-21-228 — 41-21-233.
[Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 41-21-228 — 41-21-233 (Acts 1972, ch. 705, § 1; 1980, ch. 805, §§ 1-4, 10; T.C.A., §§ 41-358 — 41-363; Acts 1983, ch. 400, §§ 6-8), concerning sentence credits, were repealed by Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 14, but the department of correction is authorized to continue their application pursuant to § 41-21-236(g).

Former § 41-21-228 read: “41-21-228. Inmate incentive program — Education and job performance credits. — (a) The commissioner of correction shall develop an inmate incentive program whereby credit may be given toward the reduction of time that an inmate is required to serve for the inmate’s participation in academic and vocational education classes sponsored by the department of correction and for above average performance in the inmate’s job placement, on the basis of a rating system devised by the commissioner.

“(b) Such reduction of sentence shall be in addition to the reduction authorized for good behavior by § 41-21-212, and the reduction authorized for honor time by § 41-21-214.

“(c) The program shall include procedures whereby credit shall be given on the basis of one (1) day of credit for each six (6) days of active participation in an academic or vocational education program or for each six (6) days in which the inmate has maintained a rating of above average performance in the inmate’s job placement.

“(d) Such credit shall apply during the first ten (10) years of an inmate’s term. During the eleventh and subsequent years of an inmate’s term, credit may be earned at the rate of two (2) days for each six (6) days of academic or vocational participation or above average job performance.

“(e) Credits earned shall be subject to the following limitations:

“(1) During the first year of the sentence, a maximum of thirty (30) days may be earned.

“(2) During the second year through the tenth year, a maximum of sixty (60) days a year may be earned.

“(3) During the eleventh and subsequent years, a maximum of ninety (90) days a year may be earned.

“(f) Credits earned under the program may be taken away in the same manner and for the same reasons as good and honor time may be taken away under the authority of § 41-21-215.”

Former § 41-21-229 read: “41-21-229. Good conduct sentence credits. — (a) Prisoners admitted after July 1, 1981, shall accrue good conduct time based upon their classification in the following manner:

“(1) Class I prisoner shall receive thirty (30) days credit for each month of the sentence served;

“(2) Class II prisoner shall receive twenty-two (22) days credit for each month of the sentence served;

“(3) Class III prisoner shall receive ten (10) days credit for each month of the sentence served; and

“(4) Class IV prisoner shall receive no credit on his sentence and shall serve his sentence day for day.

“Each prisoner shall be designated as a Class III prisoner for the first calendar year of his sentence commencing with his sentence effective date. In the second calendar year of a prisoner’s sentence, a prisoner shall be classified as a Class II prisoner. From the eleventh calendar year of a prisoner’s sentence through the remainder of his sentence, a prisoner shall be classified as a Class I prisoner. Provided, however, at the sole discretion of the commissioner, any inmate convicted of three (3) or more disciplinary offenses committed within a twelve (12) month period or convicted of any major infraction designated as a Class ‘A’ disciplinary offense, including, but not limited to, rape, arson, riot, escape or assault with a deadly weapon, may be designated as a Class IV prisoner for any portion of the remainder of the sentence imposed.

“(b) Good conduct credits shall not adhere to the sentence imposed, but must be earned by proper behavior. For each month of custody in which an inmate has not committed a disciplinary offense he shall earn a sentence credit accorded to his assigned class as specified in subsection (a). Good conduct credits can be taken away only for the commission of a disciplinary infraction.

“(c) The allowances which can be earned pursuant to this section may be referred to as good conduct sentence credits and shall affect parole eligibility and sentence expiration dates in the same manner as good and honor time credits affected such dates prior to July 1, 1981.

“(d) This section shall not apply to sentences imposed upon Class X offenders.

“(e) When, after a conviction, a person is transferred to the custody of the department from the custody of a local jurisdiction, he shall be given credit by the department for the maximum good conduct sentence credit which he could have earned on his state sentence while in the custody of the local jurisdiction, unless the department is advised by the local jurisdiction that the inmate has earned a lesser sentence credit.

“(f) The sentence credits which can be earned pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other sentence credits authorized by law.”

Former § 41-21-230 read: “41-21-230. Prisoner performance sentence credits. — (a)(1) Those persons committed to the custody of the department of correction shall be assigned to work and/or educational and/or vocational training programs, when positions in such programs are available.

“(2) Each inmate who performs within a program shall earn time credits toward the sentence imposed, varying between one (1) day and fifteen (15) days a month in accordance with the criteria established by the department depending upon the program to which he is assigned. No prisoner shall have the right to participate in any particular program and may be transferred from one assignment to another without cause. Provided, however, after a prisoner is assigned to participate in a vocational or educational program such prisoner may not be transferred from such program until completion of such program except for cause.

“(3) Such sentence credits may not be earned for a period of less than one calendar month or for any month in which a prisoner commits a Class ’A’ disciplinary offense of which he is convicted.

“(4) A prisoner may be deprived of those sentence credits earned pursuant to this section only for the commission of any major infraction designated by the department as a Class ‘A’ disciplinary offense, including, but not limited to, rape, arson, riot, escape or assault with a deadly weapon, or refusal to participate in an assignment.

“(5) Further, the refusal of a prisoner to participate in an assigned work, education or vocational training program shall constitute a disciplinary offense for which the prisoner can be penalized by the loss of good conduct time.

“(b) The allowances which can be earned pursuant to this section shall be referred to as prisoner performance sentence credits and shall affect parole eligibility and sentence expiration dates in the same manner as incentive time credits affected such dates prior to September 1, 1980.

“(c) The sentence credits which can be earned pursuant to this section shall be in addition to any other sentence credits authorized by law.

“(d) This section shall not apply to sentences imposed upon Class X offenders.”

Former § 41-21-231 read: “41-21-231. Conversion system for credits earned before July 1, 1981. — On or before September 1, 1981, with regard to those persons sentenced to the department of correction upon the conviction of an offense committed prior to July 1, 1981, the department of correction shall convert from a system where time allowances for good conduct must be earned. The sentence credits to which such persons shall be entitled shall be computed as follows:

“(1) A determination shall be made as to that proportionate amount of good and honor time which adhered to the sentence(s) imposed which can be ascribed to the portion of the sentence(s) served by such persons as of July 1, 1981.

“(2) A determination shall be made as to the actual amount of good and honor time allowances which had been taken away from such persons for disciplinary offenses committed before July 1, 1981.

“(3) A determination shall be made as to the net amount of good conduct time earned by such persons between July 1, 1981 and September 1, 1981.

“(4) The figure derived by applying the procedures specified in subdivision (2) shall be subtracted from the figure derived by applying the procedures specified in subdivision (1). If the number derived by following this procedure is a positive figure, the person shall be credited with that amount of good conduct time plus that net figure derived by applying the procedures specified in subdivision (3). If the number derived by following this procedure is zero or a negative figure, the person shall be credited with zero days of good conduct time, plus that net figure derived by applying the procedures specified in subdivision (3).

“(5) After July 1, 1981, such persons shall be entitled to earn good conduct time in accordance with § 41-21-229, and no person thereafter shall be entitled to sentence credits pursuant to §§ 41-21-212 or 41-21-214.”

Former § 41-21-232 read: “41-21-232. Loss of sentence credits. — (a) Sentence credits earned pursuant to §§ 41-21-229 and 41-21-230 may only be taken away pursuant to an inmate’s conviction of a disciplinary offense by an institutional disciplinary committee for the reasons stated in the respective sections. Only those sentence credits actually earned by the inmate may be taken away. Those sentence credits may not be restored.

“(b) The sentence credits accorded to inmates pursuant to the conversion procedures set forth in § 41-21-231 shall be treated in the same manner as is provided in subsection (a).”

Former § 41-21-233 read: “41-21-233. Rules and regulations. — The department of correction shall adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the requirements of the Administrative Procedures Act, which designate the manner in which the sentence credit system established in §§ 41-21-229 and 41-21-230 shall be administered. The rules and regulations shall delineate the following:

“(1) The department’s disciplinary procedures;

“(2) The department’s guidelines for the taking away of good conduct and prisoner performance sentence credits;

“(3) The department’s guidelines for the placement of an inmate in Class IV status;

“(4) The effect of sentence credits upon the various types of sentences imposed; and

“(5) The criteria for the earning of prisoner performance credits.”

41-21-234. Uniforms of inmates.

All inmates assigned to the custody of the department of correction shall be clothed in a uniform manufactured by TRICOR. The style and materials of the uniform shall be selected by the commissioner and shall be sufficient to distinguish the inmates from all other persons who are not assigned to the custody of the department. TRICOR shall operate programs within correctional facilities to manufacture this clothing.

All inmates who are performing work or hard labor outside the confines of a correctional facility under guard or the direct supervision of a correctional employee shall be clothed in a uniform of peculiar style so as to clearly distinguish the inmates from other persons.

As used in subdivision (b)(1), “uniform of peculiar style” includes, but is not limited to, a uniform comprised of a series of horizontal stripes.

An inmate who receives the privilege of unsupervised release into the community in order to participate in a program of work release, educational release, restitutional release, prerelease, furlough or parole shall not be required to wear a department of correction inmate uniform during those periods when the inmate is participating in the program and is not on department property.

Acts 1984, ch. 982, § 1; 1986, ch. 513, § 1; 2003, ch. 187, § 2.

41-21-235. Sexual abuse treatment program for incarcerated sex offenders.

The department of correction, in cooperation with the department of mental health and substance abuse services, shall develop a sexual abuse treatment program for sex offenders incarcerated after the program is instituted.

Successful participation and completion of the treatment program shall be a consideration for parole from a correctional institution.

Acts 1985, ch. 478, § 35; 1998, ch. 970, § 1; 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2010, ch. 1100, § 69; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Cross-References. Child sexual abuse, title 37, ch. 1, part 6.

Persons with severe impairments, title 33, ch. 6, part 3.

Post-plea treatment system for sexual offenders, victims and their families, § 33-6-805.

Probation, paroles and pardons, title 40, ch. 28.

41-21-236. Sentence reduction credits.

Those persons committed to the custody of the department of correction shall be assigned to work, educational and/or vocational training programs when positions in those programs are available.

Each inmate who exhibits good institutional behavior or who exhibits satisfactory performance within a program may be awarded time credits toward the sentence imposed, varying between one (1) day and sixteen (16) days for each month served, with not more than eight (8) days for each month served for good institutional behavior and not more than eight (8) days for each month served for satisfactory program performance in accordance with the criteria established by the department.

In addition to the time program performance credit awarded pursuant to subdivision (a)(2)(A), the department shall provide an educational good time credit of sixty (60) days to any qualifying prisoner who successfully receives a high school equivalency credential or a high school diploma, a two-year or four-year college degree, or a two-year or four-year certification in applied sciences, or who receives a vocational education diploma as provided and defined by the department. No credit shall be given for any diploma, degree or certification unless the particular course of study, including the institution or entity through which it is offered, has received the prior approval of the department. A qualifying prisoner may receive no more than one (1) credit of sixty (60) days, regardless of the number of programs completed.

It is the legislative intent that this credit be implemented by the department in a manner that maximizes the potential of prisoners who will return to the community to become working and productive members of society through the benefit of their educational diploma or certificate. It is further the legislative intent that existing educational and vocational programs offered by the department shall not be increased in size as a result of this subdivision (a)(2). Priority in enrollment in existing educational and vocational programs shall be given to prisoners who will be eligible for parole or release upon completion of their sentence and who can reasonably be expected to re-enter the workforce. Priority in enrollment shall also be given to prisoners who will be incarcerated by the department for such period of time that they will receive the full credit for sentence reduction provided in this subdivision (a)(2). Once these priorities have been met, enrollment in educational and vocational programs by other prisoners shall be available on a space-available basis, without any sentence reduction credit for any diploma or certification received.

The provisions of this subdivision (a)(2)(B) permitting an additional sixty (60) days of educational credit for obtaining a diploma shall not apply to any prisoner convicted of an offense that requires service of at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the sentence under § 40-35-501(i) or one hundred percent (100%) of the sentence under § 39-13-523.

The sixty (60) days of educational good time credit authorized by this subdivision (a)(2)(B) shall also apply to any inmate who successfully received one (1) of the degrees specified in this subdivision (a)(2)(B) prior to July 1, 2006, as well as those receiving degrees after July 1, 2006.

In addition to the credits authorized by subdivision (a)(2)(A) and this subdivision (a)(2)(B), the department shall provide a credit of sixty (60) days to any qualifying prisoner who successfully completes an evidence-based, intensive residential substance use disorder treatment therapeutic community program of at least nine (9) months in the department.

It is the legislative intent that this credit be implemented by the department in a manner that maximizes the potential of prisoners who have a history of substance use disorders returning to the community to become working and productive members of society by breaking the cycle of substance use and criminal behavior through successful completion of intensive substance use disorder treatment.

The provisions of this subdivision (a)(2)(C) permitting an additional sixty (60) days of credit for successful completion of the intensive substance use disorder treatment program shall not apply to any prisoner convicted of an offense that requires service of at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the sentence under § 40-35-501(i) or one hundred percent (100%) of the sentence under § 39-13-523 or § 40-35-501(l).

The sixty (60) days of credit authorized by this subdivision (a)(2)(C) shall apply to any inmate who successfully completes an evidence-based, intensive residential substance use disorder treatment therapeutic community program of at least nine (9) months in the department on or after July 1, 2018.

No inmate shall have the right to any such time credits, nor shall any inmate have the right to participate in any particular program, and may be transferred from one (1) assignment to another without cause. This section shall also apply to any inmate sentenced to the department of correction who is being held on a contract basis by a private correctional corporation.

Sentence credits shall not be earned or credited automatically, but rather shall be awarded on a monthly basis to an inmate at the discretion of the responsible warden in accordance with the criteria established by the department, and only after receipt by the warden of written documentation evidencing the inmate's good institutional behavior or satisfactory program performance or both.

Sentence credits may not be awarded toward a period of less than one (1) calendar month or for any month in which an inmate commits a Class A disciplinary offense of which the inmate is found guilty. No sentence credits for good institutional behavior may be awarded for any month in which an inmate commits any disciplinary offense of which the inmate is found guilty.

An inmate may be deprived of those sentence credits previously awarded pursuant to this section only for the commission of any major infraction designated by the department as a Class A disciplinary offense, including, but not limited to, rape, arson, riot, escape or assault with a deadly weapon, or refusal to participate in an assignment.

The refusal of an inmate to participate in any assigned work, educational or vocational training program shall constitute a disciplinary offense for which the inmate can be penalized by the loss of sentence credits previously awarded.

Sentence credits shall not be earned or credited to any inmates classified as maximum security or being held in punitive segregation.

The allowances that can be awarded pursuant to this section shall be referred to as inmate sentence reduction credits and shall affect release eligibility and sentence expiration dates in the same manner as time credits affected parole eligibility and sentence expiration dates prior to September 1, 1980.

Any provision of title 40, chapter 35 to the contrary notwithstanding, persons convicted under that chapter may be awarded sentence reduction credits as set forth in this section.

Any provision of titles 39 and 40 to the contrary notwithstanding, all persons who commit Class X felonies on or after December 11, 1985, shall be eligible for the sentence reduction credits authorized by this section.

Any person who committed a felony, including any Class X felony, prior to December 11, 1985, may become eligible for the sentence reduction credits authorized by this section by signing a waiver, in writing, of the right to serve the sentence under the law in effect at the time the crime was committed. However, sentence reduction credits authorized by this section may be awarded only for conduct or performance from and after the date a person becomes eligible under this subsection (c).

Sentence reduction credits for good institutional behavior as authorized by this section shall likewise apply in accordance with the terms of this section, and under the criteria, rules and regulations established by the department, to all felony offenders serving sentences of one (1) or more years in local jails or workhouses and to all inmates serving time in county jails or workhouses because the inmate's commitment to the department has been delayed due to invocation of the governor's emergency overcrowding powers or through an injunction from a federal court restricting the intake of inmates into the department. When this section is applied to those offenders, references to “warden” in this part shall be deemed references to the superintendent or jailer, as appropriate. Such felony offenders shall not be eligible to receive any other sentence credits for good institutional behavior; provided, that, in addition to the sentence reduction credits for good institutional behavior as authorized by this section, such felony offenders may receive any credits for which they are eligible under chapter 2 of this title for work performed or satisfactory performance of job, educational or vocational programs.

Sentence reduction credits for good institutional behavior as authorized by this section shall also be awarded to all convicted felons for the time incarcerated prior to the imposition of sentence. The total credit to which a convicted felon may be entitled shall be calculated by determining the number of days actually served in jail prior to imposition of sentence and by adding to that number the sentence reduction credits awarded for good institutional behavior, if any, based upon the number of days served.

The sentence reduction credits authorized by subdivision (e)(1) shall be awarded at the rate of eight (8) days for each month served prior to imposition of sentence unless there is an objection filed by the superintendent or jailer. If the superintendent or jailer objects to the number of sentence reduction credits awarded to a particular felon, the superintendent or jailer shall provide written documentation to the department stating the objection and the number of sentence credits, if any, the felon should be awarded. If an objection is filed in accordance with this subdivision (e)(2), the department shall adjust the number of sentence reduction credits awarded to conform to the number recommended in the superintendent's or jailer's written objection.

Notwithstanding the fact that in the absence of an objection from the superintendent or jailer the sentence reduction credits authorized by this subsection (e) are awarded automatically, no convicted felon shall have a right to the credits nor shall the felon have a right to appeal the superintendent's or jailer's determination concerning the number of sentence reduction credits a particular felon should be awarded as set out in the superintendent's or jailer's written objection to the department.

Except as provided in subdivision (f)(2), an inmate serving a misdemeanor sentence in a county jail, workhouse or other local facility who exhibits good institutional behavior or who exhibits satisfactory performance within a program shall be awarded inmate sentence reduction credits toward the inmate's release and expiration dates at the same rate and in the same manner as is provided in this section for inmates serving felony sentences.

If an inmate is serving a misdemeanor sentence in a local facility that awards sentence credits at a different rate than provided by this section for felons, the inmate may elect to receive the sentence credits either under the system provided in this section for felons or under the system in effect at the local facility.

In no event may an inmate receive credits cumulatively under both systems or receive credits at a rate that is less than that provided by this section for felons.

In imposing a misdemeanor sentence, the court shall fix a percentage of the sentence that an inmate shall serve before release from confinement. After service of that percentage and allowance for credits authorized in this section, the defendant shall be released from confinement. The percentage shall be expressed as thirty percent (30%), forty percent (40%), fifty percent (50%), sixty percent (60%), seventy percent (70%), eighty percent (80%), ninety percent (90%) or one hundred percent (100%). In no event shall the application of sentence credits result in more than a twenty-five percent (25%) reduction in the inmate's release percentage.

The department is authorized to continue the application of the previously enacted sentence credit systems formerly codified in §§ 41-21-212 [repealed], 41-21-213 [repealed], 41-21-214 [repealed], 41-21-215 [repealed], 41-21-228 [repealed], 41-21-229 [repealed], 41-21-230 [repealed], 41-21-231 [repealed], 41-21-232 [repealed] and 41-21-233 [repealed], to any inmates to whom they currently apply and who do not sign written waivers as provided in subsection (c). Any sentence credits earned or awarded under previously enacted systems shall continue to remain in full force and effect unless and until they are taken away in accordance with the procedures established by the previously enacted systems.

Nothing in this section shall operate to reduce the minimum sentence of a person convicted of the offense of driving under the influence of an intoxicant as prohibited by §§ 55-10-401 and 55-10-402.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no sentence credits authorized by this section or any other law, nor a sentence contract authorized by §§ 40-28-115, 40-28-116, 40-34-103 and 40-35-501 or any other law, shall have the effect of reducing the amount of time an inmate must serve before the inmate's earliest release eligibility date, undiminished by any sentence credits, by more than thirty-five percent (35%). For inmates sentenced for offenses committed on or after January 1, 1988, no sentence credits or sentence contract shall have the effect of reducing the amount of time an inmate must serve before the inmate's earliest release eligibility date, undiminished by the sentence credits, by more than thirty percent (30%).

As used in this section, “sentence credits” includes any credit, whether called that or not, that results in a reduction of the amount of time an inmate must serve on the original sentence or sentences. This section shall not be applicable when the powers granted pursuant to this title are in effect to reduce prison overcrowding.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §§ 12, 52; 1988, ch. 599, § 1; 1989, ch. 42, § 1; 1997, ch. 356, § 1; 2006, ch. 624, § 1; 2007, ch. 350, § 1; 2013, ch. 154, § 41; 2016, ch. 794, § 1; 2018, ch. 1040, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. The Sentencing Reform Act of 1989 in effect repealed the Class X Felonies Act of 1979.

Acts 1989, Ch. 42, § 2 provided that the amendment by that act applied to all persons incarcerated on March 28, 1989, while awaiting imposition of sentence.

Title 39, referred to in this section, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 1989, ch. 591.

The sections of title 41, ch. 21, referred to in this section, were repealed by Acts 1989, ch. 591.

The sentencing commission terminated June 30, 1995. Sentencing Commission Comments have been retained, but do not reflect 1995 or subsequent legislation.

The former last sentence of (i), which read: “The sentencing commission shall review the effect of these provisions as part of its duties under law.”, was deleted by the code commission, since the sentencing commission terminated June 30, 1995.

According to State v. Palmer, 902 S.W.2d 391, subdivision (f)(4) directly conflicts with §§ 40-35-104, 40-35-117, and 40-35-302; and according to that case, a statute is implicitly repealed by a subsequent statute if the two statutes are in irreconcilable conflict.

Cross-References. Classification of felonies, § 40-35-110.

Attorney General Opinions. Sentence credits for inmates of county jails or workhouses, OAG 96-061, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 68 (4/4/96).

Board of probation and parole has no authority to remove sentence credits earned in local jail or workhouse pursuant to T.C.A. §§ 41-2-123, 41-2-146, 41-2-147 or 41-21-236, OAG 05-031 (3/29/05) 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 31.

41-21-237. Charges assessed against inmates for services provided by state.

The commissioner of correction is authorized to assess nonindigent inmates reasonable charges for the housing, board, health care, education, vocational training and treatment services provided to them by this state. The inmate shall be notified of the amount of any assessment.

The charges assessed against an inmate pursuant to subsection (a) may be deducted directly from the inmate's institutional trust fund account without the inmate's consent; provided, that the inmate is notified of the amount so deducted and the charges to which it has been applied.

The commissioner shall, on a quarterly basis, provide each inmate with a statement detailing all deposits into, withdrawals from and balance remaining in the inmate's institutional trust fund account during the preceding three (3) months.

Acts 1992, ch. 1022, § 4.

41-21-238. Educational and vocational training plan — Documentation.

In addition to the education plan authorized by § 41-21-509, the commissioner of education, with the assistance of the commissioner of correction and a representative from the board of regents and the University of Tennessee system, shall by January 1, 1995, formulate a plan to increase the educational and vocational opportunities currently available to inmates in the custody of the department of correction. This plan shall emphasize basic educational skills such as reading and writing, but shall also include possible use of existing community colleges and vocational schools for inmates who are acceptable security risks and are in need of a marketable free-work skill that cannot be obtained within the confines of a correctional institution.

Upon implementation of the plan, the commissioner of correction, with the assistance of the board of parole, shall monitor and document the effectiveness of the plan. Documentation shall include:

The number of inmates who participate;

The amount of improvement in educational or vocational skills achieved by the participating inmates;

The percentage of participating inmates able to obtain employment upon their release from custody; and

The recidivism rate of inmates who participated in the plan.

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Acts 1994, ch. 730, § 1; 1998, ch. 1049, § 63; 2011, ch. 410, § 2(d), (e); 2013, ch. 236, § 64; 2015, ch. 182, § 6; 2019, ch. 345, § 65; 2020, ch. 711, § 8.

Code Commission Notes.

The former last sentence in subsection (b), regarding the initial date by which legislation should be submitted to the committees to fund and make the plan operational, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2006.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

Acts 2012, ch. 727, § 1 amended § 4-3-104, which concerns name changes of departments and divisions, to provide that references to the board of probation and parole, formerly referred to in subsection (b), are deemed references to the board of parole.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (c), substituted “the state and local government and education committees of the senate, the education committee of the house of representatives, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections” for “the state and local government committee of the senate, the state government committee of the house of representatives, the education committee of the senate and the education administration and planning committee of the house of representatives”.

The 2020 amendment deleted (c) which read: “The results of the monitoring of the plan, as well as any recommendations for improving the plan, shall, on an annual basis, be submitted to the state and local government and education committees of the senate, the education committee of the house of representatives, and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over corrections for review.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Acts 2020, ch. 711, § 11. June 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Parole determinations, § 40-35-503.

41-21-239. Work release or furlough of dangerous inmates — Notice to law enforcement officials.

If a person under the custody of the department of correction has been convicted of a homicide offense or aggravated rape or rape, the commissioner shall notify the appropriate chief of police or sheriff when the person is released from custody on work release or furlough or is otherwise allowed to leave the grounds of the penitentiary and work in the community, whether or not the work is supervised or unsupervised. The chief of police or sheriff, or both if the political subdivision to which the person is released has both officials, shall be notified at least five (5) days prior to the date the person will be released or allowed to leave the grounds of the penitentiary to work in the community. The notice shall contain:

The name of the inmate;

The nature of the crime the inmate committed;

The name of the company and address of the site where the inmate will be working, excluding those working on highway crews;

The address where the inmate will be staying on furlough; and

The length of the furlough.

Acts 1994, ch. 865, § 1.

41-21-240. Notification to victims of inmate's release.

At least ninety (90) days prior to the date an inmate serving a felony sentence of two (2) or more years in a facility operated by or under contract with the department of correction is scheduled to be released by reason of expiration of that inmate's sentence, any victim or victim's representative who complies with subsection (b) shall be given notice by the department of the tentative date of the inmate's scheduled release and that the date is subject to change as a result of the award or loss of sentence credits and other factors. The notice required by this section shall be in writing, unless the victim or victim's representative is registered with the state's electronic victim notification system, in which case the notice shall be communicated to the victim or victim's representative by the method or methods indicated by the registration in the system. The department's responsibility to provide this notice at least ninety (90) days prior to the tentative date of the inmate's scheduled release upon expiration is contingent upon the department's receipt of all relevant sentencing information within that time period.

In order for a victim or victim's representative to be notified as provided in subsection (a), the victim or victim's representative must either send the department a written statement requesting notification and providing the address at which notification is to be made or register with the state's electronic victim notification system and specify the method or methods available within the system for communication of the notice. At any time a victim or victim's representative may withdraw a request for notification by sending the department a written notarized statement that the request for notification is withdrawn or, if the victim or victim's representative is registered with the state's electronic victim notification system, by cancelling that registration in the system.

Pursuant to subsection (b), the notification required by subsection (a) shall be sent to the address provided by the victim or victim's representative if the notification is requested by written statement, or shall be communicated to the victim or victim's representative by the method or methods indicated by the registration in the state's electronic victim notification system if the victim or victim's representative is registered with that system. It is the responsibility of the victim or the victim's representative to provide the department with a current mailing address or other means of communication indicated in the electronic victim notification system registration.

Any identifying information concerning a crime victim or a crime victim's representative who has been notified or requested that notification be provided to the victim or the victim's representative pursuant to this section shall be confidential.

For purposes of subdivision (d)(1), “identifying information” means the name, home and work addresses, telephone numbers and social security number of the person being notified or requesting that notification be provided.

Acts 1996, ch. 709, § 1; 2009, ch. 176, § 3; 2018, ch. 598, §§ 4-6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 709, § 3 provided that this section shall apply to all requests for notification made on or after July 1, 1996.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

41-21-241. Meals and supplemental provisions between meals for pregnant prisoners or detainees.

A correctional institution shall provide a pregnant prisoner or detainee with nutritionally appropriate meals and appropriate supplemental provisions between meals. As used in this section, “correctional institution,” “detainee,” and “prisoner” have the same meaning as in § 41-21-204(c)(2).

Acts 2020, ch. 762, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 41-21-241 (Acts 1997, ch. 388, § 1), concerning sexual contact with inmates, was transferred to § 39-16-408 in 2006.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 762, § 3. July 1, 2020.